Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2532
Bonds; treatment.

(1) The representatives or agents of the board and a person executing the bonds shall not be liable personally on such bonds by reason of the issuance thereof.

(2) The bonds shall not be a debt of any political subdivision other than the joint public agency or of this state, and neither this state nor any other political subdivision shall be liable thereon. Bonds shall be payable only out of any funds or properties of the issuing joint public agency. Such limitations shall be plainly stated upon the face of the bonds.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 32.